Massachusetts, session 194th, H4544.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 10 of chapter 15A of General Laws is hereby further amended by 
inserting the following paragraph:-  
HISPANIC-SERVING INSTITUTION.—The term ‘‘Hispanic-serving institution’’ 
means an institution of higher education that—  
(a) is accredited by an agency or association recognized by the Massachusetts 
Department of Higher Education; and  
(b) has an enrollment of undergraduate full-time equivalent students that is at least 25 
percent Hispanic students at the end of the award year immediately preceding the date of 
application; and  
(c) offers at least two-year academic programs that lead to a degree; and  
(d) has high enrollment of students in need  

of 4 12  SECTION 2. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 47 a new section:-  
Section 48. Subject to appropriation by the legislature, in such instances where said 
funding has been granted, amounts credited to the fund may be expended by the commissioner 
for purposes related to Hispanic-serving institutions.  
(a) TYPES OF ACTIVITIES AUTHORIZED.—Grants awarded under this title shall be 
used by Hispanic-serving institutions of higher education to assist the institutions to plan, 
develop, undertake, and carry out programs to improve and expand the institutions’ capacity to 
serve Hispanic students and other low-income students.  
(b) AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES.—Grants awarded under this section shall be used for 
one or more of the following activities:  
(1) Purchase, rental, or lease of scientific or laboratory equipment for educational 
purposes, including instructional and research purposes.  
(2) Construction, maintenance, renovation, and improvement in classrooms, libraries, 
laboratories, and other instructional facilities.  
(3) Support of faculty exchanges, faculty development, curriculum development, 
academic instruction, and faculty fellowships to assist in attaining advanced degrees in the 
fellow’s field of instruction.  
(4) Purchase of library books, periodicals, and other educational materials, including 
telecommunications program material.  

of 4 32  (5) Tutoring, counseling, and student service programs designed to improve academic 
success, including innovative and customized instruction courses (which may include remedial 
education and English language instruction) designed to help retain students and move the 
students rapidly into core courses and through program completion.  
(6) Articulation agreements and student support programs designed to facilitate the 
transfer from two-year to four-year institutions.  
(7) Funds management, administrative management, and acquisition of equipment for use 
in strengthening funds management.  
(8) Joint use of facilities, such as laboratories and libraries.  
(9) Establishing or improving a development office to strengthen or improve 
contributions from alumni and the private sector.  
(10) Establishing or improving an endowment fund.  
(11) Creating or improving facilities for Internet or other Distance education 
technologies, including purchase or rental of telecommunications technology equipment or 
services.  
(12) Establishing or enhancing a program of teacher education designed to qualify 
students to teach in public elementary schools and secondary schools.  
(13) Establishing community outreach programs that will encourage elementary school 
and secondary school students to develop the academic skills and the interest to pursue 
postsecondary education.  

of 4 52  (14) Expanding the number of Hispanic and other underrepresented graduate and 
professional students that can be served by the institution by expanding courses and institutional 
resources.  
(15) Providing education, counseling services, or financial information designed to 
improve the financial literacy and economic literacy of students or the students’ families, 
especially with regard to student indebtedness and student assistance programs under title IV.